Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.080

Injunction bond.

No injunction or restraining order shall be granted until the party asking it shall enter into a bond, in such a sum as shall be fixed by the court or judge granting the order, with surety to the satisfaction of the clerk of the superior court, to the adverse party affected thereby, conditioned to pay all damages and costs which may accrue by reason of the injunction or restraining order. The sureties shall, if required by the clerk, justify as provided by law, and until they so justify, the clerk shall be responsible for their sufficiency. The court in its sound discretion may waive the required bond in situations in which a person's health or life would be jeopardized.

[ 1994 c 185 s 5; 1957 c 51 s 9; Code 1881 s 159; 1877 p 33 s 159; 1869 p 39 s 157; 1854 p 153 s 117; RRS s 725.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 65(c).

Corporate surety—Insurance: Chapter 48.28 RCW.